Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6581HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2440 Section 1. 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 159, section 1, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 SECTION 1. LIMITATIONS OF STANDING APPROPRIATIONS ââ FY 3 2025-2026. Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the 4 following designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 5 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from 6 the general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 7 following designated purpose shall not exceed the following 8 amount: 9 For payment of claims for nonpublic school pupil 10 transportation under section 285.2 : 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,997,091 12 9,183,974.55 13 If total approved claims for reimbursement for nonpublic 14 school pupil transportation exceed the amount appropriated in 15 accordance with this section, the department of education shall 16 prorate the amount of each approved claim. 17 Sec. 2. PAYMENT OF CLAIMS FOR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL PUPIL 18 TRANSPORTATION. The department of education shall use the 19 additional moneys appropriated in this Act to pay any claim for 20 nonpublic school pupil transportation under section 285.2 that 21 was not submitted in a timely manner due to an administrative 22 error. 23 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 24 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 25